District of Columbia statutes.
10-305

Mega recreation centers.

The Mayor shall develop, construct, and implement mega recreation centers in strategic locations throughout the District of Columbia. Such centers shall be spacious enough to accommodate several indoor activities simultaneously and contain state of the art equipment and apparatus.

Mar. 23, 1995, D.C. Law 10-246, § 6, 42 DCR 452

History

1981 Ed., § 8-305.

Prior Codifications

See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 10-301.

Emergency Legislation